Illinois, session 104th, HB5298.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 5changing Sections 3-2-2 and 3-2.5-61 and by adding Section 63-2-2.5 as follows: 7    (730 ILCS 5/3-2-2)8    Sec. 3-2-2. Powers and duties of the Department. 9    (1) In addition to the powers, duties, and 10responsibilities which are otherwise provided by law, the 11Department shall have the following powers:12        (a) To accept persons committed to it by the courts of 13    this State for care, custody, treatment, and 14    rehabilitation, and to accept federal prisoners and 15    noncitizens over whom the Office of the Federal Detention 16    Trustee is authorized to exercise the federal detention 17    function for limited purposes and periods of time.18        (b) To develop and maintain reception and evaluation 19    units for purposes of analyzing the custody and 20    rehabilitation needs of persons committed to it and to 21    assign such persons to institutions and programs under its 22    control or transfer them to other appropriate agencies. In 23    consultation with the Department of Alcoholism and   HB5298- 2 -LRB104 18286 RLC 31726 b1    Substance Abuse (now the Department of Human Services), 2    the Department of Corrections shall develop a master plan 3    for the screening and evaluation of persons committed to 4    its custody who have alcohol or drug abuse problems, and 5    for making appropriate treatment available to such 6    persons; the Department shall report to the General 7    Assembly on such plan not later than April 1, 1987. The 8    maintenance and implementation of such plan shall be 9    contingent upon the availability of funds.10        (b-1) To create and implement, on January 1, 2002, a 11    pilot program to establish the effectiveness of 12    pupillometer technology (the measurement of the pupil's 13    reaction to light) as an alternative to a urine test for 14    purposes of screening and evaluating persons committed to 15    its custody who have alcohol or drug problems. The pilot 16    program shall require the pupillometer technology to be 17    used in at least one Department of Corrections facility. 18    The Director may expand the pilot program to include an 19    additional facility or facilities as he or she deems 20    appropriate. A minimum of 4,000 tests shall be included in 21    the pilot program. The Department must report to the 22    General Assembly on the effectiveness of the program by 23    January 1, 2003.24        (b-5) To develop, in consultation with the Illinois 25    State Police, a program for tracking and evaluating each 26    inmate from commitment through release for recording his   HB5298- 3 -LRB104 18286 RLC 31726 b1    or her gang affiliations, activities, or ranks.2        (c) To maintain and administer all State correctional 3    institutions and facilities under its control and to 4    establish new ones as needed. Pursuant to its power to 5    establish new institutions and facilities, the Department 6    may, with the written approval of the Governor, authorize 7    the Department of Central Management Services to enter 8    into an agreement of the type described in subsection (d) 9    of Section 405-300 of the Department of Central Management 10    Services Law. The Department shall designate those 11    institutions which shall constitute the State Penitentiary 12    System. The Department of Juvenile Justice shall maintain 13    and administer all State youth centers pursuant to 14    subsection (d) of Section 3-2.5-20. 15        Pursuant to its power to establish new institutions 16    and facilities, the Department may authorize the 17    Department of Central Management Services to accept bids 18    from counties and municipalities for the construction, 19    remodeling, or conversion of a structure to be leased to 20    the Department of Corrections for the purposes of its 21    serving as a correctional institution or facility. Such 22    construction, remodeling, or conversion may be financed 23    with revenue bonds issued pursuant to the Industrial 24    Building Revenue Bond Act by the municipality or county. 25    The lease specified in a bid shall be for a term of not 26    less than the time needed to retire any revenue bonds used   HB5298- 4 -LRB104 18286 RLC 31726 b1    to finance the project, but not to exceed 40 years. The 2    lease may grant to the State the option to purchase the 3    structure outright.4        Upon receipt of the bids, the Department may certify 5    one or more of the bids and shall submit any such bids to 6    the General Assembly for approval. Upon approval of a bid 7    by a constitutional majority of both houses of the General 8    Assembly, pursuant to joint resolution, the Department of 9    Central Management Services may enter into an agreement 10    with the county or municipality pursuant to such bid.11        (c-5) To build and maintain regional juvenile 12    detention centers and to charge a per diem to the counties 13    as established by the Department to defray the costs of 14    housing each minor in a center. In this subsection (c-5), 15    "juvenile detention center" means a facility to house 16    minors during pendency of trial who have been transferred 17    from proceedings under the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 to 18    prosecutions under the criminal laws of this State in 19    accordance with Section 5-805 of the Juvenile Court Act of 20    1987, whether the transfer was by operation of law or 21    permissive under that Section. The Department shall 22    designate the counties to be served by each regional 23    juvenile detention center.24        (d) To develop and maintain programs of control, 25    rehabilitation, and employment of committed persons within 26    its institutions.  HB5298- 5 -LRB104 18286 RLC 31726 b1        (d-5) To provide a pre-release job preparation program 2    for inmates at Illinois adult correctional centers. 3        (d-10) To provide educational and visitation 4    opportunities to committed persons within its institutions 5    through temporary access to content-controlled tablets 6    that may be provided as a privilege to committed persons 7    to induce or reward compliance. 8        (e) To establish a system of supervision and guidance 9    of committed persons in the community.10        (f) To establish in cooperation with the Department of 11    Transportation to supply a sufficient number of prisoners 12    for use by the Department of Transportation to clean up 13    the trash and garbage along State, county, township, or 14    municipal highways as designated by the Department of 15    Transportation. The Department of Corrections, at the 16    request of the Department of Transportation, shall furnish 17    such prisoners at least annually for a period to be agreed 18    upon between the Director of Corrections and the Secretary 19    of Transportation. The prisoners used on this program 20    shall be selected by the Director of Corrections on 21    whatever basis he deems proper in consideration of their 22    term, behavior and earned eligibility to participate in 23    such program - where they will be outside of the prison 24    facility but still in the custody of the Department of 25    Corrections. Prisoners convicted of first degree murder, 26    or a Class X felony, or armed violence, or aggravated   HB5298- 6 -LRB104 18286 RLC 31726 b1    kidnapping, or criminal sexual assault, aggravated 2    criminal sexual abuse or a subsequent conviction for 3    criminal sexual abuse, or forcible detention, or arson, or 4    a prisoner adjudged a Habitual Criminal shall not be 5    eligible for selection to participate in such program. The 6    prisoners shall remain as prisoners in the custody of the 7    Department of Corrections and such Department shall 8    furnish whatever security is necessary. The Department of 9    Transportation shall furnish trucks and equipment for the 10    highway cleanup program and personnel to supervise and 11    direct the program. Neither the Department of Corrections 12    nor the Department of Transportation shall replace any 13    regular employee with a prisoner.14        (g) To maintain records of persons committed to it and 15    to establish programs of research, statistics, and 16    planning.17        (h) To investigate the grievances of any person 18    committed to the Department and to inquire into any 19    alleged misconduct by employees or committed persons; and 20    for these purposes it may issue subpoenas and compel the 21    attendance of witnesses and the production of writings and 22    papers, and may examine under oath any witnesses who may 23    appear before it; to also investigate alleged violations 24    of a parolee's or releasee's conditions of parole or 25    release; and for this purpose it may issue subpoenas and 26    compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of   HB5298- 7 -LRB104 18286 RLC 31726 b1    documents only if there is reason to believe that such 2    procedures would provide evidence that such violations 3    have occurred.4        If any person fails to obey a subpoena issued under 5    this subsection, the Director may apply to any circuit 6    court to secure compliance with the subpoena. The failure 7    to comply with the order of the court issued in response 8    thereto shall be punishable as contempt of court.9        (i) To appoint and remove the chief administrative 10    officers, and administer programs of training and 11    development of personnel of the Department. Personnel 12    assigned by the Department to be responsible for the 13    custody and control of committed persons or to investigate 14    the alleged misconduct of committed persons or employees 15    or alleged violations of a parolee's or releasee's 16    conditions of parole shall be conservators of the peace 17    for those purposes, and shall have the full power of peace 18    officers outside of the facilities of the Department in 19    the protection, arrest, retaking, and reconfining of 20    committed persons or where the exercise of such power is 21    necessary to the investigation of such misconduct or 22    violations. This subsection shall not apply to persons 23    committed to the Department of Juvenile Justice under the 24    Juvenile Court Act of 1987 on aftercare release.25        (j) To cooperate with other departments and agencies 26    and with local communities for the development of   HB5298- 8 -LRB104 18286 RLC 31726 b1    standards and programs for better correctional services in 2    this State.3        (k) To administer all moneys and properties of the 4    Department.5        (l) To report annually to the Governor on the 6    committed persons, institutions, and programs of the 7    Department.8        (l-5) (Blank).9        (m) To make all rules and regulations and exercise all 10    powers and duties vested by law in the Department.11        (n) To establish rules and regulations for 12    administering a system of sentence credits, established in 13    accordance with Section 3-6-3, subject to review by the 14    Prisoner Review Board.15        (o) To administer the distribution of funds from the 16    State Treasury to reimburse counties where State penal 17    institutions are located for the payment of assistant 18    state's attorneys' salaries under Section 4-2001 of the 19    Counties Code.20        (p) To exchange information with the Department of 21    Human Services and the Department of Healthcare and Family 22    Services for the purpose of verifying living arrangements 23    and for other purposes directly connected with the 24    administration of this Code and the Illinois Public Aid 25    Code.26        (q) To establish a diversion program.  HB5298- 9 -LRB104 18286 RLC 31726 b1        The program shall provide a structured environment for 2    selected technical parole or mandatory supervised release 3    violators and committed persons who have violated the 4    rules governing their conduct while in work release. This 5    program shall not apply to those persons who have 6    committed a new offense while serving on parole or 7    mandatory supervised release or while committed to work 8    release.9        Elements of the program shall include, but shall not 10    be limited to, the following:11            (1) The staff of a diversion facility shall 12        provide supervision in accordance with required 13        objectives set by the facility.14            (2) Participants shall be required to maintain 15        employment.16            (3) Each participant shall pay for room and board 17        at the facility on a sliding-scale basis according to 18        the participant's income.19            (4) Each participant shall:20                (A) provide restitution to victims in 21            accordance with any court order;22                (B) provide financial support to his 23            dependents; and24                (C) make appropriate payments toward any other 25            court-ordered obligations.26            (5) Each participant shall complete community   HB5298- 10 -LRB104 18286 RLC 31726 b1        service in addition to employment.2            (6) Participants shall take part in such 3        counseling, educational, and other programs as the 4        Department may deem appropriate.5            (7) Participants shall submit to drug and alcohol 6        screening.7            (8) The Department shall promulgate rules 8        governing the administration of the program.9        (r) To enter into intergovernmental cooperation 10    agreements under which persons in the custody of the 11    Department may participate in a county impact 12    incarceration program established under Section 3-6038 or 13    3-15003.5 of the Counties Code.14        (r-5) (Blank).15        (r-10) To systematically and routinely identify with 16    respect to each streetgang active within the correctional 17    system: (1) each active gang; (2) every existing 18    inter-gang affiliation or alliance; and (3) the current 19    leaders in each gang. The Department shall promptly 20    segregate leaders from inmates who belong to their gangs 21    and allied gangs. "Segregate" means no physical contact 22    and, to the extent possible under the conditions and space 23    available at the correctional facility, prohibition of 24    visual and sound communication. For the purposes of this 25    paragraph (r-10), "leaders" means persons who:26            (i) are members of a criminal streetgang;  HB5298- 11 -LRB104 18286 RLC 31726 b1            (ii) with respect to other individuals within the 2        streetgang, occupy a position of organizer, 3        supervisor, or other position of management or 4        leadership; and5            (iii) are actively and personally engaged in 6        directing, ordering, authorizing, or requesting 7        commission of criminal acts by others, which are 8        punishable as a felony, in furtherance of streetgang 9        related activity both within and outside of the 10        Department of Corrections.11    "Streetgang", "gang", and "streetgang related" have the 12    meanings ascribed to them in Section 10 of the Illinois 13    Streetgang Terrorism Omnibus Prevention Act.14        (s) To operate a super-maximum security institution, 15    in order to manage and supervise inmates who are 16    disruptive or dangerous and provide for the safety and 17    security of the staff and the other inmates.18        (t) To monitor any unprivileged conversation or any 19    unprivileged communication, whether in person or by mail, 20    telephone, or other means, between an inmate who, before 21    commitment to the Department, was a member of an organized 22    gang and any other person without the need to show cause or 23    satisfy any other requirement of law before beginning the 24    monitoring, except as constitutionally required. The 25    monitoring may be by video, voice, or other method of 26    recording or by any other means. As used in this   HB5298- 12 -LRB104 18286 RLC 31726 b1    subdivision (1)(t), "organized gang" has the meaning 2    ascribed to it in Section 10 of the Illinois Streetgang 3    Terrorism Omnibus Prevention Act.4        As used in this subdivision (1)(t), "unprivileged 5    conversation" or "unprivileged communication" means a 6    conversation or communication that is not protected by any 7    privilege recognized by law or by decision, rule, or order 8    of the Illinois Supreme Court.9        (u) To establish a Women's and Children's Pre-release 10    Community Supervision Program for the purpose of providing 11    housing and services to eligible female inmates, as 12    determined by the Department, and their newborn and young 13    children.14        (u-5) To issue an order, whenever a person committed 15    to the Department absconds or absents himself or herself, 16    without authority to do so, from any facility or program 17    to which he or she is assigned. The order shall be 18    certified by the Director, the Supervisor of the 19    Apprehension Unit, or any person duly designated by the 20    Director, with the seal of the Department affixed. The 21    order shall be directed to all sheriffs, coroners, and 22    police officers, or to any particular person named in the 23    order. Any order issued pursuant to this subdivision 24    (1)(u-5) shall be sufficient warrant for the officer or 25    person named in the order to arrest and deliver the 26    committed person to the proper correctional officials and   HB5298- 13 -LRB104 18286 RLC 31726 b1    shall be executed the same as criminal process. 2        (u-6) To appoint a point of contact person who shall 3    receive suggestions, complaints, or other requests to the 4    Department from visitors to Department institutions or 5    facilities and from other members of the public.6        (u-7) To collaborate with the Department of Human 7    Services and other State agencies to develop and implement 8    screening and follow-up protocols for intake and reentry 9    personnel and contractors on identification and response 10    to Department-involved individuals who demonstrate 11    indications of past labor or sex trafficking 12    victimization, criminal sexual exploitation or a history 13    of involvement in the sex trade that may put them at risk 14    of human trafficking. Protocols should include assessment 15    and provision of pre-release and post-release housing, 16    legal, medical, mental health and substance-use disorder 17    treatment services and recognize the specialized needs of 18    victims of human trafficking. 19        (u-8) To provide statewide training for Department of 20    Corrections intake and reentry personnel and contractors 21    on identification and response to Department-involved 22    individuals who demonstrate indications of past 23    trafficking victimization or child sexual exploitation 24    that put them at risk of human trafficking. 25        (u-9) To offer access to specialized services for 26    Department-involved individuals within the care that   HB5298- 14 -LRB104 18286 RLC 31726 b1    demonstrate indications of past trafficking victimization 2    or child sexual exploitation that put them at risk of 3    trafficking. As used in this subsection, "specialized 4    services" means substance use substance-use disorder, 5    mental health, medical, case-management, housing, and 6    other support services by Department employees or 7    contractors who have completed victim-centered, 8    trauma-informed training specifically designed to address 9    the complex psychological and or physical needs of victims 10    of human trafficking, sexual exploitation, or a history of 11    involvement with the sex trade. 12        (u-10) To submit an annual report to the Governor and 13    General Assembly containing the information provided in 14    Section 3-2-2.5. 15        (v) To do all other acts necessary to carry out the 16    provisions of this Chapter.17    (2) The Department of Corrections shall by January 1, 181998, consider building and operating a correctional facility 19within 100 miles of a county of over 2,000,000 inhabitants, 20especially a facility designed to house juvenile participants 21in the impact incarceration program.22    (3) When the Department lets bids for contracts for 23medical services to be provided to persons committed to 24Department facilities by a health maintenance organization, 25medical service corporation, or other health care provider, 26the bid may only be let to a health care provider that has   HB5298- 15 -LRB104 18286 RLC 31726 b1obtained an irrevocable letter of credit or performance bond 2issued by a company whose bonds have an investment grade or 3higher rating by a bond rating organization.4    (3.5) If the Department has a contract with a pharmacy 5benefit manager or a contract with an insurance company, 6health maintenance organization, limited health service 7organization, administrative services organization, or any 8other managed care entity or health insurance issuer where a 9pharmacy benefit manager administers the provider's coverage 10of, payment for, or formulary design for drugs necessary to 11safeguard the minor's life or health, the contract with the 12pharmacy benefit manager and the pharmacy benefit manager's 13activities shall be subject to Article XXXIIB of the Illinois 14Insurance Code and the authority of the Director of Insurance 15to enforce those provisions. The provider shall have all the 16rights of a plan sponsor under those provisions. 17    (4) When the Department lets bids for contracts for food 18or commissary services to be provided to Department 19facilities, the bid may only be let to a food or commissary 20services provider that has obtained an irrevocable letter of 21credit or performance bond issued by a company whose bonds 22have an investment grade or higher rating by a bond rating 23organization.24    (5) On and after the date 6 months after August 16, 2013 25(the effective date of Public Act 98-488), as provided in the 26Executive Order 1 (2012) Implementation Act, all of the   HB5298- 16 -LRB104 18286 RLC 31726 b1powers, duties, rights, and responsibilities related to State 2healthcare purchasing under this Code that were transferred 3from the Department of Corrections to the Department of 4Healthcare and Family Services by Executive Order 3 (2005) are 5transferred back to the Department of Corrections; however, 6powers, duties, rights, and responsibilities related to State 7healthcare purchasing under this Code that were exercised by 8the Department of Corrections before the effective date of 9Executive Order 3 (2005) but that pertain to individuals 10resident in facilities operated by the Department of Juvenile 11Justice are transferred to the Department of Juvenile Justice. 12    (6) The Department of Corrections shall provide lactation 13or nursing mothers rooms for personnel of the Department. The 14rooms shall be provided in each facility of the Department 15that employs nursing mothers. Each individual lactation room 16must: 17        (i) contain doors that lock; 18        (ii) have an "Occupied" sign for each door; 19        (iii) contain electrical outlets for plugging in 20    breast pumps; 21        (iv) have sufficient lighting and ventilation; 22        (v) contain comfortable chairs; 23        (vi) contain a countertop or table for all necessary 24    supplies for lactation; 25        (vii) contain a wastebasket and chemical cleaners to 26    wash one's hands and to clean the surfaces of the   HB5298- 17 -LRB104 18286 RLC 31726 b1    countertop or table; 2        (viii) have a functional sink; 3        (ix) have a minimum of one refrigerator for storage of 4    the breast milk; and 5        (x) receive routine daily maintenance. 6(Source: P.A. 103-834, eff. 1-1-25; 104-27, eff. 1-1-26; 7104-159, eff. 1-1-26; revised 11-21-25.) 8    (730 ILCS 5/3-2-2.5 new)9    Sec. 3-2-2.5. Annual report of the Department of 10Corrections to the Governor and General Assembly. The annual 11report of the Director of Corrections to the Governor and 12General Assembly shall contain: 13    (1) the number of students aged 18 or older, but younger 14than 22, who are enrolled in the High School Diploma Program 15operating in Department of Corrections facilities during the 16preceding school year, listed by correctional facility;17    (2) the total number of special education students aged 18 18or older, but younger than 22, who are enrolled in the High 19School Diploma Program during the preceding school year, 20listed by correctional facility;21    (3) the number of students aged 18 or older, but younger 22than 22, who had individualized education program meetings and 23were enrolled in the High School Diploma Program during the 24preceding school year, listed by correctional facility;25    (4) the number of students aged 18 or older, but younger   HB5298- 18 -LRB104 18286 RLC 31726 b1than 22, who had special education evaluations completed and 2were enrolled in the High School Diploma Program during the 3preceding school year, listed by correctional facility;4    (5) the number of students aged 18 or older, but younger 5than 22, who had functional behavior analyses completed and 6were enrolled in the High School Diploma Program during the 7preceding school year, listed by correctional facility;8    (6) the number of employees currently employed in the High 9School Diploma Program and their titles and credentials;10    (7) the number of Department of Juvenile Justice employees 11in non-teaching positions working in the High School Diploma 12Program and their titles and credentials;13    (8) the number of students aged 18 or older, but younger 14than 22, who have graduated from the High School Diploma 15Program in the preceding school year, listed by correctional 16facility;17    (9) the daily schedule for the High School Diploma Program 18for the preceding school year, listed by correctional 19facility;20    (10) the number of students aged 18 or older, but younger 21than 22, who are enrolled in the High School Diploma Program 22and are provided with speech language therapy services as 23required by their individual educational plans, listed by 24correctional facility;25    (11) the number of students aged 18 or older, but younger 26than 22, who are enrolled in the High School Diploma Program   HB5298- 19 -LRB104 18286 RLC 31726 b1and are provided with social work services as required by 2their individual educational plans, listed by correctional 3facility;4    (12) the number of students aged 18 or older, but younger 5than 22, who are enrolled in the High School Diploma Program 6and are provided with speech language therapy services as 7required by their individual educational plans, listed by 8facility; 9    (13) the average length of time between the admission date 10and the first day of High School Diploma Program attendance 11for special education eligible students, ranging from shortest 12length of time to longest length of time;13    (14) the number of special education eligible students who 14did not attend the High School Diploma Program during the 15preceding school year, listed by:16        (A) students aged 18 or older, but younger than 22, 17    who opted out of the High School Diploma Program and the 18    reasons they identified for opting out;19        (B) students aged 18 or older, but younger than 22, 20    who did not receive placement in the High School Diploma 21    Program because of lack of space or available capacity in 22    the Program;23        (C) students aged 18 or older, but younger than 22, 24    who were not permitted to attend because of behavioral 25    issues, restrictive housing, a medical illness or 26    condition, admission to a residential treatment unit, or a   HB5298- 20 -LRB104 18286 RLC 31726 b1    mental health issue; and2        (D) students aged 18 or older, but younger than 22, 3    who were housed in a correctional facility without a High 4    School Diploma Program and were not able to transfer;5    (15) the number of days the High School Diploma Program 6was cancelled during the preceding school year, listed by 7correctional facility and by reason for the cancellation;8    (16) the number of High School Diploma Program students 9who did not complete the program prior to graduation during 10the preceding school year, listed by correctional facility;11    (17) the number of students aged 18 or older, but younger 12than 22, who revoked special education rights during the 13preceding school year, listed by oral revocation versus 14written revocation;15    (18) the number of mediations held by the Department of 16Juvenile Justice School District for individuals in Department 17of Corrections custody during the preceding school year;18    (19) the number of due process hearings held by the 19Department of Juvenile Justice School District for individuals 20in Department of Corrections custody during the preceding 21school year;22    (20) the number of students aged 18 or older, but younger 23than 22, who are enrolled in the High School Diploma Program 24and are provided with occupational therapy services as 25required by their individual educational plans, listed by 26correctional facility;  HB5298- 21 -LRB104 18286 RLC 31726 b1    (21) the number of students aged 18 or older, but younger 2than 22, who are enrolled in the High School Diploma Program 3and are provided with physical therapy services as required by 4their individual educational plans, listed by correctional 5facility; and6    (22) the number of students aged 18 or older, but younger 7than 22, who are enrolled in the High School Diploma Program 8and are provided with nursing services as required by their 9individual educational plans, listed by correctional facility. 10    (730 ILCS 5/3-2.5-61)11    Sec. 3-2.5-61. Annual and other reports.12    (a) The Director shall make an annual electronic report to 13the Governor and General Assembly concerning persons committed 14to the Department, its institutions, facilities, and programs, 15of all moneys expended and received, and on what accounts 16expended and received no later than January 1 of each year. The 17report shall include the ethnic and racial background data, 18not identifiable to an individual, of all persons committed to 19the Department, its institutions, facilities, programs, and 20outcome measures established with the Juvenile Advisory Board.21    (b) The Department of Juvenile Justice shall, by January 221, April 1, July 1, and October 1 of each year, electronically 23transmit to the Governor and General Assembly, a report which 24shall include the following information:25        (1) the number of youth in each of the Department's   HB5298- 22 -LRB104 18286 RLC 31726 b1    facilities and the number of youth on aftercare;2        (2) the demographics of sex, age, race and ethnicity, 3    classification of offense, and geographic location where 4    the offense occurred;5        (3) the educational and vocational programs provided 6    at each facility and the number of residents participating 7    in each program;8        (4) the present capacity levels in each facility;9        (5) staff-to-youth ratios in accordance with the 10    federal Prison Rape Elimination Act (PREA) definitions;11        (6) the number of reported assaults on staff at each 12    facility;13        (7) the number of reported incidents of youth sexual 14    aggression towards staff at each facility including sexual 15    assault, residents exposing themselves, sexual touching, 16    and sexually offensive harassing language such as repeated 17    and unwelcome sexual advances, requests for sexual favors, 18    or verbal comments, gestures, or actions of a derogatory 19    or offensive sexual nature; and20        (8) the number of staff injuries resulting from youth 21    violence at each facility including descriptions of the 22    nature and location of the injuries, the number of staff 23    injuries requiring medical treatment at the facility, the 24    number of staff injuries requiring outside medical 25    treatment and the number of days off work per injury. For 26    purposes of this Section, the definition of assault on   HB5298- 23 -LRB104 18286 RLC 31726 b1    staff includes, but is not limited to, kicking, punching, 2    knocking down, harming or threatening to harm with 3    improvised weapons, or throwing urine or feces at staff.4    (c) The requirements in subsection (b) do not relieve the 5Department from the recordkeeping requirements of the 6Occupational Safety and Health Act.7    (c-1) The Director of Juvenile Justice shall assist the 8Director of Corrections in preparing the annual report 9submitted by the Director of Corrections under Section 103-2-2.5. The annual report submitted under this Section shall 11contain the information required under Section 3-2-2.5 but 12only pertaining to persons aged 18 or older, but younger than 1322, who are in the custody of the Department of Corrections and 14are transferred to Department of Juvenile Justice facilities 15under Section 3-9-2.1 to participate in emerging adult 16programs. 17    (d) The Department shall:18        (1) establish a reasonable procedure for employees to 19    report work-related assaults and injuries. A procedure is 20    not reasonable if it would deter or discourage a 21    reasonable employee from accurately reporting a workplace 22    assault or injury;23        (2) inform each employee:24            (A) of the procedure for reporting work-related 25        assaults and injuries;26            (B) of the right to report work-related assaults   HB5298- 24 -LRB104 18286 RLC 31726 b1        and injuries; and2            (C) that the Department is prohibited from 3        discharging or in any manner discriminating against 4        employees for reporting work-related assaults and 5        injuries; and6        (3) not discharge, discipline or in any manner 7    discriminate against any employee for reporting a 8    work-related assault or injury. 9    (e) For the purposes of paragraphs (7) and (8) of 10subsection (b) only, reports shall be filed beginning July 1, 112019 or the implementation of the Department's Offender 360 12Program, whichever occurs first. 13(Source: P.A. 100-1075, eff. 1-1-19; 101-159, eff. 1-1-20.)